Hawaii statutes.
§526-15 Recording of disclaimer. If an
instrument transferring an interest in or power over property subject to a
disclaimer is required or permitted by law to be filed, recorded, or
registered, the disclaimer may be filed, recorded, or registered. Except as
otherwise provided in section 526-12(g), failure to file or record the
disclaimer does not affect its validity as between the disclaimant and persons
to whom the property interest or power passes by reason of the disclaimer. [L
2000, c 43, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 173, §4]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next